Tennessee, session 114, HB0823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 57-4-102(37)(A)(iv), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(iv) The facility is located in a municipality or county having a population in
excess of three hundred fifty thousand (350,000), according to the 2020 federal census
or any subsequent federal census;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0823
001912
- 1 -